Georgia, session 2025_26, HB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-1-1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to motor vehicles and traffic, is amended by revising paragraph (33.1) as follows:
"(33.1)(A) 'Multipurpose off-highway vehicle' means any self-propelled, motorized
vehicle having features that:
(i) Has features specifically intended for utility use; and having the following
characteristics:
(ii) Was originally manufactured to be primarily used off-highway;
H. B. 297
- 1 -

LC 39 4573
(A)(iii) Has the capability to transport persons or cargo or both;
(B)(iv) Operates between 25 miles per hour (40.2 40 kilometers per hour) and 65
miles per hour (104.6 105 kilometers per hour);
(C)(v) Has an overall width of 80 inches (2,030 millimeters) (203 centimeters) or
less, exclusive of accessories or attachments;
(D)(vi) Is designed to travel on four or more wheels;
(E)(vii) Uses a steering wheel for steering control;
(F)(viii) Contains a nonstraddle seat;
(G)(ix) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 4,000 pounds (1,814
kilograms); and
(H)(x) Has a minimum cargo capacity of 350 pounds (159 kilograms).
(B) Such term shall not include any all-terrain vehicle, low-speed vehicle, passenger
car, or personal transportation vehicle."
SECTION 2.
Article 10 of Chapter 5 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to ad
valorem taxation of motor vehicles and motor homes, is amended by adding a new part to
read as follows:
"Part 8
48-5-504.50.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'multipurpose off-highway vehicle' shall have
the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 40-1-1.
(b) As authorized pursuant to Article VII, Section I, Paragraph III(b)(3) of the Constitution
of Georgia, multipurpose off-highway vehicles shall constitute a separate classification of
self-propelled vehicles for ad valorem taxation purposes.
H. B. 297
- 2 -

LC 39 4573
(c) On and after January 1, 2026, no multipurpose off-highway vehicle shall be returned
for or subject to ad valorem taxation. The procedures prescribed in this chapter for
returning tangible personal property for ad valorem taxation and collecting the ad valorem
taxes imposed on tangible personal property shall not apply to any multipurpose
off-highway vehicle."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 297
- 3 -